Missouri, session 2026, HB1764.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 233.095, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 233.095 and 233.096, to read as follows:
233.095. 1. Said board shall have authority to expend [not more than one-fourth of
the] revenue which may now or which may hereafter be paid into its treasury for the purpose
of grading and repairing any roads or streets within the corporate limits of any city within said
special road district in conformity with the established grade of said roads and streets in said
cities and for the purpose of constructing and maintaining macadam, gravel, rock or paved
roads or streets within the corporate limits of any city within the said special road district in
conformity with the established grade of said roads and streets in said city[; provided, that].
The board shall have authority to limit the expenditure to the percentage equal to the
road mileage within the corporate limits of a city within the special road district divided
by the total road miles of the special road district. No part of the revenue of any special
road district in this state shall be expended outside of the county in which such special road
district is situated.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 1 of this section to the contrary,
in a county with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty
thousand inhabitants, the board shall spend a percentage equal to the road mileage
within the corporate limits of a city wholly or partially within the special road district
divided by the total road miles of the special road district.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1764 2
233.096. 1. Within a county with more than two hundred thousand but fewer
than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants, the governing body of an incorporated
city may, by ordinance, exclude all parcels of real property and all personal property
within such city from any special road district. The exclusion of such incorporated area
from the special road district shall apply beginning on January first of the calendar year
immediately following approval of such ordinance.
2. In each year in which an exclusion under subsection 1 of this section applies,
the special road district shall not collect from such city any real or personal property tax
or assessment from real or personal property within such incorporated city. Such
special road district shall have no obligation to expend revenues within such
incorporated city under section 233.095.
✔